Wisconsin, session 2025, AB195.
do enact as follows:AB195,11Section 1. 705.15 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 705.15 (3) (a) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB195,2,143705.15 (3) (a) (intro.) The designation of a TOD beneficiary on a document 4does not affect ownership of the property until the death of the sole owner or the 5last to die of multiple owners regardless of whether the document provides 6otherwise. The designation may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole 7owner or all then surviving owners, without the consent of the TOD beneficiary, by 8executing and recording another document that designates a different TOD 9beneficiary or no beneficiary. The recording of a document that designates a TOD 10beneficiary or no beneficiary revokes any designation made in a previously recorded 11document relating to the same property interest. Subject to par. (b), an instrument 12is effective to revoke a previously recorded document designating a TOD 13beneficiary, or any part of the previously recorded document, only if the instrument 14meets all of the following requirements:AB195,215Section 2. 705.15 (3) (a) 1. and 2. of the statutes are created to read:AB195,2,1616705.15 (3) (a) 1. The instrument is one of the following:AB195,3,217a. A document that complies with sub. (2) (a) and revokes the previously 1recorded document, or any part of the previously recorded document, expressly or 2by inconsistency.AB195,3,43b. An instrument of revocation that expressly revokes the previously recorded 4document, or any part of the previously recorded document.AB195,3,65c. An inter vivos deed that expressly revokes the previously recorded 6document, or any part of the previously recorded document.AB195,3,1172. The instrument is acknowledged by the owner after the owner 8acknowledged the previously recorded document, and the instrument is submitted 9for recording to the office of the register of deeds in the county in which the real 10property is located before the death of the sole owner or the last to die of multiple 11owners.AB195,312Section 3. 705.15 (3) (b) and (c) of the statutes are created to read:AB195,3,1413705.15 (3) (b) If a document designating a TOD beneficiary is made by more 14than one owner, all of the following apply:AB195,3,16151. Revocation by an owner does not affect the document designating a TOD 16beneficiary as to the interest of another owner.AB195,3,19172. A document designating a TOD beneficiary of real property owned by 2 or 18more individuals as joint tenants or by spouses as survivorship marital property is 19revoked only if it is revoked by all of the living joint tenants or spouses.AB195,3,2120(c) This subsection does not limit the effect of an inter vivos transfer of the 21property.AB195,422Section 4. 710.13 (3) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB195,3,2323710.13 (3) (title) Rights to rescind; disbursement of deposits.AB195,524Section 5. 710.13 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB195,4,41710.13 (3) (c) Upon receipt of a written notice of rescission described under 2par. (a) or (b), a person holding deposits or option fees described under par. (a) or (b) 3may disburse the deposits or option fees, without any liability on the person’s part, 4to the following persons:AB195,4,551. If a seller exercises its right to rescind under par. (a), to the seller.AB195,4,762. If a 3rd party assignee exercises its right to rescind under par. (b), to the 7assignee.AB195,68Section 6. 806.22 (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB195,4,99806.22 (title) Satisfying a transcript of judgment.AB195,710Section 7. 806.22 of the statutes is renumbered 806.22 (1) (intro.) and 11amended to read:AB195,4,1712806.22 (1) (intro.) If a satisfaction of a judgment has been entered on the 13judgment and lien docket in the county where it the judgment was first entered, a 14certified copy of the satisfaction or a certificate by the clerk of circuit court, under 15official seal, showing the satisfaction, any of the following may be filed with the 16clerk of circuit court of any other county where the judgment has been entered, and 17that:AB195,4,2018(2) Upon receipt of an instrument described under sub. (1), the clerk of circuit 19court shall make a similar an entry on the judgment and lien docket of that county 20similar to the entry described under s. 806.19 (1).AB195,821Section 8. 806.22 (1) (a) to (c) of the statutes are created to read:AB195,4,2222806.22 (1) (a) A certified copy of the satisfaction.AB195,4,2423(b) A certificate by the clerk of circuit court where the satisfaction was 24entered, under official seal, showing the satisfaction.AB195,5,41(c) A satisfaction signed and acknowledged by the owner or, if no assignment 2has been filed, by the owner’s attorney of record. If the satisfaction is of a part of a 3judgment or as to some of the judgment debtors, the satisfaction shall state the 4amount paid on the judgment or for the release of the debtors, naming them.AB195,95Section 9. 867.045 (1) (j) of the statutes is amended to read:AB195,5,116867.045 (1) (j) In the case of real property, a copy of the property tax bill for 7the year preceding the year of the decedent’s death, or a copy of the most recent 8property tax bill, and a legal description of the property, which description shall be 9imprinted on or attached to the application. The register of deeds shall record the 10bill. The required recording of the property tax bill may be waived by an agreement 11between the register of deeds and the county real property lister.AB195,1012Section 10. 867.046 (2) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:AB195,5,1813867.046 (2) (i) In the case of real property, a copy of the property tax bill for 14the year preceding the year of the decedent’s death, or a copy of the most recent 15property tax bill, and a legal description of the property, which description shall be 16imprinted on or attached to the application. The register of deeds shall record the 17bill. The required recording of the property tax bill may be waived by an agreement 18between the register of deeds and the county real property lister.AB195,5,1919